Missouri, session 2026, SB1677.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 302.020, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
302.020 and 302.023, to read as follows:
302.020. 1. Unless otherwise provided for by law, it
shall be unlawful for any person, except those expressly
exempted by section 302.080, to:
(1) Operate any vehicle upon any highway in this state
unless the person has a valid license;
(2) Operate a motorcycle or motortricycle upon any
highway of this state unless such person has a valid license
that shows the person has successfully passed an examination
for the operation of a motorcycle or motortricycle as
prescribed by the director. The director may indicate such
upon a valid license issued to such person, or shall issue a
license restricting the applicant to the operation of a
motorcycle or motortricycle if the actual demonstration,
required by section 302.173, is conducted on such vehicle;
(3) Authorize or knowingly permit a motorcycle or
motortricycle owned by such person or under such person's

SB 1677 2
control to be driven upon any highway by any person whose
license does not indicate that the person has passed the
examination for the operation of a motorcycle or
motortricycle or has been issued an instruction permit
therefor;
(4) Operate a motor vehicle with an instruction permit
or license issued to another person.
2. Every person under twenty-six years of age who is
operating or riding as a passenger on any motorcycle or
motortricycle, as defined in section 301.010, upon any
highway of this state shall wear protective headgear at all
times the vehicle is in motion; except that, any person
twenty-six years of age or older operating any motorcycle or
motortricycle who has been issued an instruction permit
shall wear protective headgear at all times the vehicle is
in motion. The protective headgear shall meet reasonable
standards and specifications established by the director.
No political subdivision of this state shall impose a
protective headgear requirement on the operator or passenger
of a motorcycle or motortricycle. No person shall be
stopped, inspected, or detained solely to determine
compliance with this subsection, except that a person may be
stopped, inspected, or detained when there is a reasonable
basis to suspect that a violation of this subsection
involves a child passenger under ten years of age.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 302.340
any person convicted of violating subdivision (1) or (2) of
subsection 1 of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. A
first violation of subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of
this section shall be punishable as a class D misdemeanor.
A second violation of subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1
of this section shall be punishable as a class A

SB 1677 3
misdemeanor. Any person convicted a third or subsequent
time of violating subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of
this section is guilty of a class E felony. Notwithstanding
the provisions of section 302.340, violation of subdivisions
(3) and (4) of subsection 1 of this section is a
misdemeanor, the first violation punishable as a class D
misdemeanor, a second or subsequent violation of this
section punishable as a class C misdemeanor, and the penalty
for failure to wear protective headgear as required by
subsection 2 of this section is an infraction for which a
fine not to exceed twenty-five dollars may be imposed unless
the violation involves a child passenger under ten years of
age, in which case the violation shall be punishable as an
infraction for which a fine not to exceed one hundred
dollars may be imposed. Notwithstanding all other
provisions of law and court rules to the contrary, no court
costs shall be imposed upon any person due to such
violation. No points shall be assessed pursuant to section
302.302 for a failure to wear such protective headgear.
Prior pleas of guilty and prior findings of guilty shall be
pleaded and proven in the same manner as required by section
558.021.
302.023. 1. The provisions of this section shall be
known and may be referred to as "Calvin's Law".
2. It shall be unlawful for the operator of a
motorcycle or motortricycle to allow any person under ten
years of age to ride as a passenger on a motorcycle or
motortricycle operated on any highway in this state unless
the motorcycle or motortricycle is equipped with a proper
passenger seat and the child is able to place both feet on
the passenger foot pegs, except when a licensed physician
certifies a medical exemption.

SB 1677 4
3. Any passenger under ten years of age shall wear
protective headgear meeting the requirements of section
302.020.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, a person may be stopped, inspected, or detained
solely to determine compliance with this section.
5. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 302.340
to the contrary, violation of subsection 2 or 3 of this
section shall be punishable as an infraction for which a
fine not to exceed one hundred dollars may be imposed.
Section B. The enactment of section 302.023 and the
repeal and reenactment of section 302.020 of this act shall
become effective on January 1, 2027.
✓